tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Tırmanış > Buz Tırmanışı Aletleri: Buz Tırmanışı Baltaları; Buz Tırmanışı Kramponları; Buz tırmanışı bağlama ve güvenlik kordonları; Buz Tırmanışı Vidaları; Buz vidası taşıyıcıları ve askı klipsleri
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Alpinism > Accesorii pentru alpinism pe gheață: Topoare pentru alpinism pe gheață; Crampoane pentru alpinism pe gheață; Lese și corzi de siguranță pentru alpinism pe gheață; Șuruburi pentru escaladă pe gheață; Suporturi și clipsuri pentru șuruburi de gheață
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Катерене > Инструменти за ледено катерене: Пикели за ледено катерене; Котки за ледено катерене; Осигурителни каишки и въжета за ледено катерене; Клинове за ледено катерене; Държачи за ледени винтове и клипсове за окачване
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 攀岩用品 > 攀冰工具: 攀冰斧; 攀冰冰爪; 攀冰保护绳与挽索; 攀冰螺丝; 冰锥支架与挂扣
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скалолазание > Инструменты для ледолазания: Ледорубы; Кошки для ледолазания; Темляки и самостраховки для ледовых инструментов; Винты для ледобуров; Развесочные карабины и держатели для ледобуров
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Klättring > Verktyg för isklättring: Isklättringsyxor; Isklättringsstegjärn; Fångremmar och slingor för isklättring; Isklättringsskruvar; Hållare och utrustningskarbiner för isskruvar
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Horolezectvo > Náradie na lezenie na ľade: Sekery na lezenie na ľade; Mačky na lezenie na ľade; Lano a popruhy na lezenie po ľade; Skrutky do ľadu; Držiaky na ľadové skrutky a upevňovacie spony
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Escalada > Ferramentas de escalada no gelo: Machados de escalada no gelo; Crampons de escalada no gelo; Fitas de pulso e cabos de retenção para escalada no gelo; Parafusos para escalada no gelo; Suportes para parafusos de gelo e mosquetões porta-material
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plezanje > Orodje za ledno plezanje: Cepini za ledno plezanje; Dereze za ledno plezanje; Zanke in povodci za ledno plezanje; Ledni vijaki; Nosilci za ledne vijake in sponke za opremo
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Leo núi > Dụng cụ leo núi tuyết: Rìu leo núi tuyết; Móng sắt leo núi tuyết; Dây đeo và dây buộc móc băng; Vít leo băng; Móc gài và hộp đựng vít băng
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 등반 > 빙벽등반 장비: 빙벽등반 액스; 빙벽등반 아이젠; 빙벽 등반 리시 및 테더; 빙벽등반 스크루; 아이스 스크류 홀더 및 래킹 클립
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Escalade > Matériel pour l'escalade glacière: Pioches d'escalade sur glace; Crampons d'escalade sur glace; Dragonnes et longes d’escalade sur glace; Vis d’escalade sur glace; Porte-broches à glace et mousquetons porte-matériel
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Laipiojimas > Ledo laipiojimo įrankiai: Ledkirčiai; Ledo laipiojimo katės; Ledo laipiojimo pavadėliai ir virvės; Ledo varžtai; Ledo sraigtų laikikliai ir tvirtinimo segtukai
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Klettern > Eiskletterausrüstung: Eisäxte; Eiskletter-Steigeisen; Eisgeräte-Handschlaufen & Fangleinen; Schrauben zum Eisklettern; Eisschraubenhalter & Materialkarabiner
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 攀爬運動 > 攀冰工具: 攀冰斧; 攀冰冰爪; 攀冰安全繩與繫帶; 攀冰冰錐; 冰錐掛架與快扣
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปีนเขา > เครื่องมือการปีนน้ำแข็ง: ขวานปีนน้ำแข็ง; ตะปูยึดสำหรับปีนน้ำแข็ง; สายคล้องและเชือกผูกปีนน้ำแข็ง; สกรูสำหรับปีนหน้าผาน้ำแข็ง; ที่เก็บสกรูน้ำแข็งและคลิปแขวน
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Wspinaczka > Sprzęt do wspinaczki lodowej: Siekiery do wspinaczki lodowej; Raki do wspinaczki lodowej; Lonże do czekanów; Śruby lodowe do wspinaczki; Uchwyty na śruby lodowe i karabinki sprzętowe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Escalada > Herramientas para escalada en hielo: Hachas para escalada en hielo; Crampones para escalada en hielo; Dragoneras y cabos de anclaje para escalada en hielo; Tornillo para escalada en hielo; Porta tornillos de hielo y mosquetones portamaterial
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lezectví > Výbava pro lezení na ledu: Lezení v ledu – cepíny; Lezení v ledu – skoby; Poutka a odsedky pro lezení v ledu; Lezení v ledu – šrouby; Nosiče materiálu a držáky na ledovcové šrouby
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > クライミング > アイスクライミング用品: アイスアックス; アイスクライミング用アイゼン; アイスクライミング用リーシュ・テザー; アイスクライミング用スクリュー; アイススクリューホルダー・ラッキングクリップ
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Verktøy for isklatring: Økser for isklatring; Stegjern for isklatring; Fangerliner og seler til isklatring; Isklatreskruer; Isskrueholdere og karabinkroker
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Mászás > Jégmászó eszközök: Jégmászó tengelyek; Jégmászó hómacskák; Jégmászó rögzítőkötelek (leash); Jégcsavarok; Jégcsavartartók és rögzítőkarabinerek
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kiipeily > Jääkiipeilyvälineet: Jääkiipeilykirveet; Jääkiipeilyraudat; Jääkiipeilyn karkuremmit ja nauhat; Jääkiipeilyruuvit; Jääruuvikiinnikkeet
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Arrampicata > Attrezzi per arrampicata su ghiaccio: Piccozze per arrampicata su ghiaccio; Ramponi per arrampicata su ghiaccio; Leash e longe per arrampicata su ghiaccio; Viti da ghiaccio per arrampicata; Portaviti da ghiaccio e moschettoni porta materiali
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αναρρίχηση > Εργαλεία παγοαναρρίχησης: Πιολέ παγοαναρρίχησης; Καρφιά παγοαναρρίχησης; Ιμάντες (leashes) και λουριά ασφαλείας παγοαναρρίχησης; Βίδες παγοαναρρίχησης; Βάσεις μεταφοράς παγόβιδων και κλιπ εξοπλισμού
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Isklatringredskaber: Isklatringsøkser; Isklatringsklatrejern; Sikringssnore og fangremme til isklatring; Skruer til isklatring; Holdere og klips til isskruer
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Klimmen > IJsklimmateriaal: Ijsklimbijlen; IJsklimijzers; IJsklim-leashes en -zekeringslijnen; IJsschroeven; IJsschroefhouders en materiaalkarabiners
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Penjanje > Alati za penjanje po ledu: Cepini za penjanje po ledu; Dereze za penjanje po ledu; Povodci i uzice za penjanje po ledu; Vijci za penjanje po ledu; Držači i kopče za vijke za led
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Climbing > Ice Climbing Tools: Ice Climbing Axes; Ice Climbing Crampons; Ice Climbing Leashes & Tethers; Ice Climbing Screws; Ice Screw Holders & Racking Clips
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Alpinismo > Ferramentas de escalada no gelo: Machados de escalada no gelo; Crampons de escalada no gelo; Leashes e longe para escalada no gelo; Parafusos para escalada no gelo; Suportes de parafusos de gelo e mosquetões